Utah statutes.
3-1-15.1.   Duties of officers.

Each officer has the authority and shall perform the duties set forth in the bylaws, or, to the extent consistent with the bylaws, the duties prescribed by the directors or by the officer authorized by the board of directors to prescribe the duties of other officers.

